src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
+Idf is no longer used with base form .. just +DefArt after article ...
## Moirfeolaíocht na nAinmfhocail Gaeilge (Morphology of Irish Nouns)

FEMININE NOUN continuation classes
Weak Plurals : 
Broad singular is made slender; plural already broad










Weak Plurals : Broaden 

Singular already slender; plural is made broad
















































gamhain - gamhna (gs), midheamhain - midheamhna (gs)






Strong Plurals :  +(e)anna

tóin -> tóineanna
scoth -> scothanna
EXCEPTION: an chuid -> na codanna see FIX file
EXCEPTION: an raith -> na rathanna see FIX file






















Strong Plurals : +í

an bhearna -> na bearnaí
an eala -> na healaí



Strong Plurals : Athrú e -> í

an aicme -> na haicmí (classes)
an táille -> na táillí (fees)



Strong Plurals : 












various ending in vowel  ! plurals +nna






Strong Plurals : Leathnú  +acha

an bheoir -> na beoracha (beers)





Gen Sg : Coim + ach

an chathaoir -> na cathaoireacha (chairs) (Note long vowel aoi is not sync.
an cathair -> na cathracha




Gen Sg : Coim + a
samhail -> samhla
anacair -> anacra


Gen Sg : Coim + Slen + e
crithir - critre
fothair - foithre












MASCULINE NOUN continuation classes





WEAK PLURALS (i.e. where the nominative and genitive plurals are different) 
TYPE 1 Nom pl. ends in conson. eg cat : cait, fear : fir, marcach: marcaigh 




TYPE 2 Nom pl. formed by adding -a eg cos : cosa, úll : úlla 



(TYPE 3) Nom pl. formed by adding -ta eg 


















2nd Declension
sliabh -> na sléibhte 








3rd Declension
Strong Plurals : +í 
as in Nm7 but singular are different

eg. bádóir -> na bádóirí



Strong Plurals : +anna

eg. an bláth -> na bláthanna


Strong Plurals : +aí



gen briocht -> breachta
Strong Plurals : +aí
briocht -> briochtaí


Strong Plurals : +anna
eg. an bláth -> na bláthanna


^Lea,broadening, is required, in gen sg: io -> ea (bior, crios) 
and this is done using ^Ath (change)
pl bior -> bioranna

Strong Plurals : Athrú +anna (io->ea)
eg. an cith -> na ceathanna

^Lea,broadening, is required, in gen sg: cith -> ceatha, greim -> greama
and this is done using ^Ath (change)
pl also broadened cith -> ceathanna











Strong Plurals : +í

(A) nouns ending in -ín (a diminutive)
smidiríní (smithereens) no singular
eg. an cailín -> na cailíní (girls)
eg. an báidín -> na báidíní (small boats)

(B) nouns ending in -a
eg. an balla -> na ballaí (walls)






























Strong Plurals : +idí
an fiche -> na fichidí (the twenties) eidí needs correcting
an caoga -> na caogaidí (the fifties)



















INITIAL MUTATIONS
NOMINATIVE SINGULAR 
definite article eg. an cat (m) (p38 NIG)
an t-éan(m) - the bird (p39 NIG) 
an bhróg(f) - the shoe
initial mutation for other reasons
e.g. comp. preps. ar an gcnoc, poss. mo chat

^IM = initial mutation e.g. with prepositions, and possession
Singular:
e.g. ar an bhosca, ar an mbosca
possessive markers on vowels: ár n-athair, a (f) hathair, 
Plural:
e.g. ar bhoscaí, i mboscaí
possessive e.g. ár n-aithreacha - our fathers (^C)

indefinite => no initial mutation
appending the +Len & +Ecl rather than creating seperate forms ...
adds ^h to vowel-initial words ...  but adds the +hPref to all words ... see fix file
just vowel-initial e.g. doras, fiú etc.
although no initial mutation takes place 





GENITIVE SINGULAR 

eg. tábhacht a n-oidhreachta
eg. bia cait, bia sagairt, bia stóir, 
bia rúin, pobail  
siopa grósaera - a grocer's shop
eg. bia an chait,an íl, bia an stóir 
bia an éin (the bird's food)
eg. bia an tsagairt (overgenerates 
tshagairt, h will be removed,
eg. bia an rúin, an phobail
eg. siopa an ghrósaera - the grocer's shop
VOCATIVE SINGULAR 
Since this is trivial (always ^Sé) it is included with Final Mutations
in Voc-sg-0 and Voc-sg-1.



FINAL MUTATIONS
NOMINATIVE SINGULAR

GENITIVE SINGULAR 








VOCATIVE SINGULAR 




ALL PLURALS







































































































































































































































* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-gle/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
